Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 293.148 is amended to read:
293.148. (1) If the moneys  in the Oregon Rainy Day Fund established by ORS 293.144 just prior
to the time of a transfer scheduled under ORS 293.144  (3) or 293.146 equal at least [ 7-1/2] 12.5 per-
cent of the amount of General Fund revenues  collected during the prior biennium, moneys that
would otherwise be transferred to the Oregon  Rainy Day Fund shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(2) If the moneys in the Oregon Rainy Day Fund just prior to the time  of a transfer scheduled
under ORS 293.144 (3) or 293.146 do not equal at  least [ 7-1/2] 12.5 percent of the amount of General
Fund revenues collected during the  prior biennium, the transfer to the Oregon Rainy Day Fund shall
be made regardless of whether that  transfer increases the amount in the Oregon Rainy Day Fund
to at least [ 7-1/2] 12.5  percent of the amount of  General Fund revenues collected during the prior
biennium.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1562 (SB 1562-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1562 (SB 1562-A) Page 2